District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-2303.06

Rules and regulations; register of physical therapists and approved schools; studies and investigations; subpoenas

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(g), 33 DCR 729

History

1981 Ed., §§ 2-1703.1 to 2-1703.21.

Prior Codifications